Washington statutes.
RCW 2.56.020

Appointment, compensation of assistants—Administrator, assistants not to practice law.

(1) The administrator for the courts, with the approval of the chief justice of the supreme court of this state, shall appoint and fix the compensation of such assistants as are necessary to enable performance of the power and duties vested in the administrative office of the courts.

(2) Neither the administrator nor any assistant shall engage in the private practice of law except as otherwise provided for in this section.

(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, nothing in this section prohibits the administrator or any assistant from:

(a) Performing legal services for himself or herself or his or her immediate family; or

(b) Performing legal services of a charitable nature.

(4) The legal services identified in subsection (3) of this section may not be performed if they would interfere with the duties of the administrator or any assistant and no services that are performed shall be deemed within the scope of employment.

[ 2005 c 282 s 6; 1957 c 259 s 2.]